District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “STEER Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 8(d) of Strengthening Traffic Enforcement, Education, and Responsibility
(“STEER”) Amendment Act of 2024, effective April 20, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-161; 71 DCR 2248), is
amended to read as follows:
“(d)(1) Section 3 shall apply:
“(A) With respect to the Ignition Interlock System Program established by
section 10a of the District of Columbia Traffic Act, 1925, effective April 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 13-
238; D.C. Official Code § 50-2201.05a), as of January 1, 2027; and
“(B) For all other purposes, including the Intelligent Speed Assistance
Program established by section 10a-1 of the District of Columbia Traffic Act, 1925, effective April
20, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-161; D.C. Official Code § 50-2201.05a-1), as of the effective date of the
STEER Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on February
3, 2026 (Enrolled version of B26-583).
“(2) Sections 4(d) and (f), 5, and 6 shall apply as of January 1, 2027.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective Date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2